Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 12.117 is amended to read:
12.117. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 12.110, 12.115 or 12.160[ ,]:
(a) An action based on conduct that  constitutes child abuse or conduct [ knowingly] allowing,
permitting or encouraging child abuse that  occurs while the person is under 18 years of age must
be commenced before the person attains 40 years of  age, or if the person has not discovered the
causal connection between the injury and  the child abuse, nor in the exercise of reasonable care
should have discovered the causal connection between the  injury and the child abuse, not more than
five years from the date the person discovers  or in the exercise of reasonable care should have
discovered the causal connection between the child abuse and the injury, whichever period is longer.
(b) An  action based on child sexual abuse or conduct allowing, permitting or encouraging
child sexual abuse may be commenced at any time.
(2) As used in [ subsection (1) of this section, ] this section:
(a) “Child abuse” means [ any of the following: ]
[(a)] intentional conduct by an adult that results in:
(A) Any physical injury to a child; or
(B) Any mental injury to a child  which results in observable and substantial impairment of the
child’s mental or psychological ability  to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due regard
to the culture of the child[ ;].
(b) “Child sexual abuse” means:
(A) Rape of a child,  which includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are defined in ORS chapter 163;
[(c)] (B) Sexual abuse, as defined in ORS chapter 163, when the victim is a child; or
[(d)] (C) Sexual exploitation of a child, including but not limited to:
[(A)] (i) Conduct constituting violation of ORS 163.435 and any other conduct which  allows,
employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage in the performing  for people
Enrolled House Bill 3582 (HB 3582-A) Page 1
to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or  other exhibition which, in whole or in
part, depicts sexual conduct or contact; and
[(B)] (ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring a child  to engage in prostitution or com-
mercial sexual solicitation, as [ defined in ORS chapter 167 ] those  acts are defined in ORS 167.007
and 167.008.
(3) Nothing in this section creates a new cause of action or enlarges  any existing cause of
action.
SECTION 2.  ORS 12.118 is amended to read:
12.118. (1) Notwithstanding  ORS 12.110, 12.115 or 12.160, an action based on conduct that con-
stitutes sexual assault or conduct [ knowingly] allowing,  permitting or encouraging sexual assault
that occurs when a person  is 18 years of age or older [ must be commenced within five years from the
date the person discovers, or in the exercise of reasonable care should have discovered,  the causal
connection between the sexual assault and the injury ] may be commenced at any time .
(2) As used in this section, “sexual assault” includes, but  is not limited to, any of the following:
(a) Rape, which includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful  sexual penetration and
incest, as those acts are defined in ORS chapter 163;
(b) Sexual abuse, as that act is defined in ORS chapter 163; or
(c) Sexual exploitation, which includes but is not limited to trafficking  in persons and subjecting
another person to involuntary servitude, as those acts are defined in ORS chapter 163.
(3) Nothing in this section  creates a new cause of action or enlarges any existing cause of
action.
SECTION 3.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the amendments to
ORS 12.117 and 12.118 by sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act  apply to claims arising on or after
the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2)(a) A claim based on  conduct allowing, permitting or encouraging child abuse or child
sexual abuse that  arises before the effective date of this 2025 Act is subject to the statute
of limitations provided in ORS 12.117 (1)(a), unless a final judgment has been entered on the
claim before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(b) A claim based on conduct allowing, permitting  or encouraging sexual assault that
arises before the effective date of this 2025 Act must be commenced within five years from
the date the person discovers, or in  the exercise of reasonable care should have discovered,
the causal connection between the sexual assault and the injury, unless a final judgment has
been entered on the claim before the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(c) As used in this subsection, “final judgment” means a judgment for  which the time to
appeal has expired without any party filing  an appeal or that is not subject to further appeal
or review.
SECTION 4.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3582 (HB 3582-A) Page 2
Passed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 18, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3582 (HB 3582-A) Page 3